Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3416.01
Intern architect, defined.

Intern architect means a person who has enrolled in the Architectural Experience Program of the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards and holds a degree from a program accredited by the National Architectural Accrediting Board or equivalent.

Laws 2015, LB23, § 15;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 37.